Washington statutes.
RCW 43.24.084

Professional licenses—Use of social security numbers and drivers' license numbers prohibited.

Social security numbers and drivers' license numbers may not be used as part of a professional license. Professional licenses containing such information that are in existence on January 1, 2002, shall comply with this section by the next renewal date.

[ 2001 c 276 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 276: "This act takes effect January 1, 2002." [ 2001 c 276 s 2.]